Iowa, session 2025-2026, 5354XD.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 5354XD (3) 91
as/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 815.10, subsection 3, Code 2026, is
amended to read as follows:
3. If the court determines that no contract attorney is
available to represent the person, the court may shall appoint
a noncontract attorney. The order of appointment shall include
a specific finding that no contract attorney was available.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate
importance, takes effect upon enactment.